src/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_19ALOMANÕ/PEDÄJÄNE-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_19PEDÄJÄNE !!= @CODE@ pedäjäne:pedäjä
! Gradation: No
!	N_19PEDÄJÄNE-SG ;
!	N_19PEDÄJÄNE-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_19PEDÄJÄNE-SG
!+Num:%{front%}	NMN_19ALOMANÕ/PEDÄJÄNE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_19PEDÄJÄNE-PL
!+Num:%{front%}	NMN_19ALOMANÕ/PEDÄJÄNE-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_20LATSʼ !!= @CODE@ latsʼ:lats
!	N_20LATSʼ-SG ;
!        NUM_20LATSʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_20LATSʼ-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_20LATSʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_20LATSʼ-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_20LATSʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_20TÄÜSʼ !!= @CODE@ täüsʼ:täü
!        NUM_20TÄÜSʼ-SG ;
!	N_20TÄÜSʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_20TÄÜSʼ-SG
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_20TÄÜSʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_20TÄÜSʼ-PL
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_20TÄÜSʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_20VÄITSʼ !!= @CODE@ väitsʼ:väits
!        NUM_20VÄITSʼ-SG ;
!	N_20VÄITSʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_20VÄITSʼ-SG
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_20VÄITSʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_20VÄITSʼ-PL
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_20VÄITSʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_20KÜÜDSʼ !!= @CODE@ küüdsʼ:küüds
!	N_20KÜÜDSʼ-SG ;
!        NUM_20KÜÜDSʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_20KÜÜDSʼ-SG
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_20KÜÜDSʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_20KÜÜDSʼ-PL
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_20KÜÜDSʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_20MIISʼ
!	N_20MIISʼ-SG ;
!        NUM_20MIISʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_20MIISʼ-SG
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_20MIISʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_20MIISʼ-PL
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_20MIISʼ-PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_21HÜDSI !!= @CODE@ hüdsi:hüdsi
!	N_21HÜDSI-SG ;
!        NUM_21HÜDSI-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_21HÜDSI-SG
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_21HÜDSI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_21HÜDSI-PL
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_21HÜDSI-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_22VÕROKÕNÕ !!= @CODE@ võrokõnõ:võrokõ
! Gradation: No
!        NUM_22VÕROKÕNÕ-SG ;
!	N_22VÕROKÕNÕ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_22VÕROKÕNÕ-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_22VÕROKÕNÕ/VÄHÄKENE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_22VÕROKÕNÕ-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_22VÕROKÕNÕ/VÄHÄKENE-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_22NAANÕ !!= @CODE@ naanõ:naa
! Gradation: No
!        NUM_22NAANÕ-SG ;
!        NUM_22NAANÕ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_22NAANÕ-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_22NAANÕ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_22NAANÕ-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_22NAANÕ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_22VÄHÄKENE !!= @CODE@ vähäkene:vähäke
! Gradation: No
!        NUM_22VÄHÄKENE-SG ;
!        NUM_22VÄHÄKENE-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_22VÄHÄKENE-SG
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_22VÕROKÕNÕ/VÄHÄKENE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_22VÄHÄKENE-PL
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_22VÕROKÕNÕ/VÄHÄKENE-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_23NUULʼ !!= * @CODE@ nuulʼ:nool
! Gradation: No
! NUM_23NUULʼ-SG ;
! NUM_23NUULʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_23NUULʼ-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_23NUULʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_23NUULʼ-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_23NUULʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_23SUURʼ !!= * @CODE@ suurʼ:suur
! Gradation: No
! NUM_23SUURʼ-SG ;
! NUM_23SUURʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_23SUURʼ-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_23SUURʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_23SUURʼ-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_23SUURʼ-PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_23KIILʼ  !!= * @CODE@ kiilʼ:keel
! Gradation: No
! NUM_23KIILʼ-SG ;
! NUM_23KIILʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_23KIILʼ-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_23KIILʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_23KIILʼ-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_23KIILʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_23HIIRʼ  !!= * @CODE@ hiirʼ:hiir
! Gradation: No
! NUM_23HIIRʼ-SG ;
! NUM_23HIIRʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_23HIIRʼ-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_23HIIRʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_23HIIRʼ-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_23HIIRʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_24KÄSI
! gradation: yes
!! vowel_harmony: front
! NUM_24KÄSI-SG ;
! NUM_24KÄSI-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_24KÄSI-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_24KÄSI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_24KÄSI-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_24KÄSI-PL ;
!+Num+Sg+Numom+WORK: K ;

!LEXICON NUM_24SUSI
! gradation: yes
! vowel_harmony: front
! NUM_24SUSI-SG ;
! NUM_24SUSI-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_24SUSI-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_24SUSI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_24SUSI-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_24SUSI-PL ;
!+Num+Sg+Numom+WORK: K ;

!LEXICON NUM_25SÜÄ
!        NUM_25SÜÄ-SG ;
!        NUM_25SÜÄ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_25SÜÄ-SG
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_25SÜÄ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_25SÜÄ-PL
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_25SÜÄ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_25ASÕQ
!        NUM_25ASÕQ-SG ;
!        NUM_25ASÕQ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_25ASÕQ-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_25ASÕQ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_25ASÕQ-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_25ASÕQ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_26HEPEMʼ
! NUM_26HEPEMʼ-SG ;
! NUM_26HEPEMʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_26HEPEMʼ-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_26HEPEMʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_26HEPEMʼ-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_26HEPEMʼ-PL ;
!+Num+Sg+Numom+WORK: K ;

!LEXICON NUM_27EHEQ
! NUM_27EHEQ-SG ;
! NUM_27EHEQ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_27EHEQ-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_27ASTÕQ/EHEQ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_27EHEQ-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_27ASTÕQ/EHEQ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_HAPU !!= * __@CODE@__ hapu:hapu
! gradation: yes
! NUM_HAPU-SG ;
! NUM_HAPU-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_HAPU-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_27HAPU-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_HAPU-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_27HAPU-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_28TÜTÄRʼ !!= * __@CODE@__ tütärʼ:tütär
! NUM_28TÜTÄRʼ-SG ;
! NUM_28TÜTÄRʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_28TÜTÄRʼ-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_28TÜTÄRʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_28TÜTÄRʼ-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_28TÜTÄRʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_28PINNÄRʼ !!= * __@CODE@__ pinnärʼ:pindär
! NUM_28PINNÄRʼ-SG ;
! NUM_28PINNÄRʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_28PINNÄRʼ-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_28PINNÄRʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_28PINNÄRʼ-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_28PINNÄRʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_28PAPÕRʼ !!= * __@CODE@__ papõrʼ:papõr
! NUM_28PAPÕRʼ-SG ;
! NUM_28PAPÕRʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_28PAPÕRʼ-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_28PAPÕRʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_28PAPÕRʼ-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_28PAPÕRʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_28KANNÕLʼ !!= * __@CODE@__ kannõlʼ:kandõl
! NUM_28KANNÕLʼ-SG ;
! NUM_28KANNÕLʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_28KANNÕLʼ-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_28KANNÕLʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_28KANNÕLʼ-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_28KANNÕLʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_28SÕSARʼ !!= * __@CODE@__ sõsarʼ:sõsar
! NUM_28SÕSARʼ-SG ;
! NUM_28SÕSARʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_28SÕSARʼ-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_28SÕSARʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_28SÕSARʼ-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_28SÕSARʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_28PUNDAR
! NUM_28PUNDAR-SG ;
! NUM_28PUNDAR-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_28PUNDAR-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_28PUNDAR-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_28PUNDAR-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_28PUNDAR-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_29KUU !!= * @CODE@ kuu:kuu
!! Gradation: No
! NUM_29KUU-SG ;
! NUM_29KUU-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_29KUU-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_29KUU-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_29KUU-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_29KUU-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_29HÄÄ !!= * @CODE@ pää:pää
! Gradation: No
! NUM_29HÄÄ-SG ;
! NUM_29HÄÄ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_29HÄÄ-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_29HÄÄ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_29HÄÄ-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_29HÄÄ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_30MAA
! Gradation: No
! NUM_30MAA-SG ;
! NUM_30MAA-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_30MAA-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_30MAA-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_30MAA-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_30MAA-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_30TÜÜ
! Gradation: No
! NUM_30TÜÜ-SG ;
! NUM_30TÜÜ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_30TÜÜ-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_30TÜÜ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_30TÜÜ-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_30TÜÜ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_31TÄI
! Gradation: No
! NUM_31TÄI-SG ;
! NUM_31TÄI-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_31TÄI-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_31TÄI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_31TÄI-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_31TÄI-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_31MAI
! Gradation: No
! NUM_31MAI-SG ;
! NUM_31MAI-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_31MAI-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_31MAI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_31MAI-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_31MAI-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_32VERI !!veri:ver
! NUM_32VERI-SG ;
! NUM_32VERI-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_32VERI-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_32VERI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_32VERI-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_32VERI-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_33IGÄ !!igä:igä
! gradation: yes
! NUM_33IGÄ-SG ;
! NUM_33IGÄ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_33IGÄ-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_33XX/IGÄ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_33IGÄ-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_33XX/IGÄ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_34TULI
! NUM_34TULI-SG ;
! NUM_34TULI-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_34TULI-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_34TULI/SÜLI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_34TULI-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_34TULI/SÜLI-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_35TARÕ
!! tarõ:tar
! NUM_35TARÕ-SG ;
! NUM_35TARÕ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_35TARÕ-SG
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_35TARÕ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_35TARÕ-PL
!+Num:%{back%} NMN_35TARÕ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_35PESÄ
!! pesä:tar
! NUM_35PESÄ-SG ;
! NUM_35PESÄ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_35PESÄ-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_35UMA/PESÄ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_35PESÄ-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_35UMA/PESÄ-PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_35NIMI
!! nimi:nim
! NUM_35NIMI-SG ;
! NUM_35NIMI-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_35NIMI-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_35LUMI/NIMI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_35NIMI-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_35LUMI/NIMI-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_36HANGʼ !!= @CODE@ hangʼ:hang
!        NUM_36HANGʼ-SG ;
!	N_36HANGʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_36HANGʼ-SG
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_36HANGʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_36HANGʼ-PL
!+Num:%{back%}     NMN_36HANGʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_36SÄRGʼ !!= @CODE@ särgʼ:särg
!        NUM_36SÄRGʼ-SG ;
!        NUM_36SÄRGʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_36SÄRGʼ-SG
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_36SÄRGʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_36SÄRGʼ-PL
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_36SÄRGʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_36PÄIV !!= @CODE@ päiv:päiv
!        NUM_36PÄIV-SG ;
!        NUM_36PÄIV-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_36PÄIV-SG
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_36PÄIV-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_36PÄIV-PL
!+Num:%{front%}     NMN_36PÄIV-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_36SILM !!= * @CODE@ silm:silm
!!! harmony: front
! NUM_36SILM-SG ;
! NUM_36SILM-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_36SILM-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_36SILM-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_36SILM-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_36SILM-PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_36LÄHK !!= * @CODE@ lähk:lähk
!! harmony: front
! NUM_36LÄHK-SG ;
! NUM_36LÄHK-PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_36LÄHK-SG
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_36LÄHK-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_36LÄHK-PL
!+Num:%{front%} NMN_36LÄHK-PL ;

LEXICON NUM_36KATSʼ !!= * @CODE@ katsʼ:kat
 NUM_36KATSʼ-SG ;
 NUM_36KATSʼ-PL ;
LEXICON NUM_36KATSʼ-SG
+Num:%{back%} NMN_36KATSʼ/ÜTSʼ-SG ;
LEXICON NUM_36KATSʼ-PL
+Num:%{back%} NMN_36KATSʼ/ÜTSʼ-PL ;

LEXICON NUM_36ÜTSʼ !!= * @CODE@ ütsʼ:üt
 NUM_36ÜTSʼ-SG ;
 NUM_36ÜTSʼ-PL ;
LEXICON NUM_36ÜTSʼ-SG
+Num:%{front%} NMN_36KATSʼ/ÜTSʼ-SG ;
